District of Columbia statutes.
16-5505

Exemptions.

This chapter shall not apply to any claim for relief brought against a person primarily engaged in the business of selling or leasing goods or services, if the statement or conduct from which the claim arises is:

(1)

A representation of fact made for the purpose of promoting, securing, or completing sales or leases of, or commercial transactions in, the person’s goods or services; and

(2)

The intended audience is an actual or potential buyer or customer.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-351, § 6, 58 DCR 741
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 401, 59 DCR 6190

History

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this chapter into law.

Editor's Notes